Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
Article 9 Poisons

26-4-160.
Sales and labeling.

No person shall furnish by retail sale any poison enumerated in this Code section without distinctly labeling the bottle, box, vessel, or paper in which the poison is contained, and also the outside wrapper or cover thereof, with the name of the article, the word “Poison,” and the name and place of business of the person who furnishes the same; and no poison shall be furnished unless upon due inquiry it shall be found that the person to whom it is delivered is aware of its poisonous character and shall represent that it is to be used for a legitimate purpose:

Schedule “A.” Arsenic and its preparations, corrosive sublimate, white precipitate, red precipitate, biniodide of mercury, cyanide of potassium, hydrocyanic acid, strychnia, and all other poisonous vegetable alkaloids and their salts; essential oil of bitter almonds, opium and its preparations, except paregoric and other preparations of opium containing less than two grains to the ounce; and

Schedule “B.” Aconite, belladonna, colchicum, conium, nux vomica, henbane, creosote, digitalis, and their pharmaceutical preparations; croton oil, chloroform, chloral hydrate, sulfate of zinc, mineral acids, carbolic acid, and oxalic acid.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-160

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1.

26-4-161.
Procedure on sale or delivery of listed poisons.

No licensed pharmacist shall sell or deliver any of the poisons included in paragraph (1) of Code Section 26-4-160 without first making an entry in a book for that purpose, stating the date of the delivery, the name and address of the person receiving the poison, the name and quantity of the poison, the purpose for which it is represented by such person to be required, and the name of the dispenser. Such book shall always be open for inspection by the proper authorities and shall be preserved for reference for at least five years.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-161

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1.

26-4-162.
Prescriptions by practitioners of the healing arts.

This article shall not apply to the dispensing of poisons in not unusual quantities or doses, upon the prescriptions of practitioners of the healing arts.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-162

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1.

26-4-163.
Penalty for violation of article.

Any person violating this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-163

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1.